Rhode Island statutes. Title 18 Fiduciaries
Chapter 2 Appointment of Fiduciaries

18-2-1.
Appointment of trustees by superior court.

If no trustee is named in any instrument creating a trust, or the trustee named in the instrument renounces or declines to accept the trust, or whenever a trustee, either original or substituted, and whether appointed by a court or otherwise, is dead, or desires to be discharged from the trust or powers reposed in or conferred on the trustee, or refuses to act or is incapable of acting as trustee, then any person interested under the trust, or the surviving or continuing trustees or trustee for the time being, or the personal representatives of the last surviving or continuing trustee, may apply to the superior court and the court may at that time, after due notice to the parties in interest, or to any of them that the court shall adjudge to be necessary parties, appoint some suitable person or persons to be trustee or trustees, or new trustee or trustees, as the case may be, under the trust.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 208, § 1; P.L. 1896, ch. 346, § 1; P.L. 1899, ch. 680, § 1; C.P.A. 1905, § 1143; G.L. 1909, ch. 259, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 303, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 486, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

18-2-1

.

18-2-2.
Change in number of trustees.

On application for the appointment of a new trustee, the number of trustees may be increased or decreased; but this action is, upon petition, subject to review by the supreme court.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 208, § 2; C.P.A. 1905, § 1144; G.L. 1909, ch. 259, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 303, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 486, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

18-2-2

.

18-2-3.
Filling of vacancies not obligatory with court.

On application for the appointment of a new trustee, it shall not be obligatory to appoint more than one new trustee where only one trustee was originally appointed, nor to fill up the original number of trustees where two (2) or more than two (2) trustees were originally appointed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 208, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 259, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 303, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 486, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

18-2-3

.

18-2-4.
Title in judicially appointed trustees.

In all cases where a trustee or trustees shall be or shall have been appointed under any instrument creating a trust by the order or decree of any court of competent jurisdiction, either within or without the state of Rhode Island, the order or decree shall vest in the appointed trustee or trustees, either solely or jointly with the then surviving or other trustee or trustees, as the case may be, the title of all the trust estate and property, in the same manner as though they had been named as original trustee or trustees in the instrument creating the trust. However, the court, in its discretion, may order the conveyance or other assurance of the trust estate or of any part of the trust estate that it may deem necessary or proper for more effectually vesting the trust estate.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 208, § 4; P.L. 1899, ch. 680, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 259, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 303, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 486, § 4; P.L. 1947, ch. 1954, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

18-2-4

.

18-2-5.
Powers of judicially appointed trustees.

Every trustee appointed pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall have the same powers, authorities, and discretions, and may in all respects act as if the trustee had been originally appointed a trustee by the instrument, if any, creating the trust.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 208, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 259, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 303, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 486, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

18-2-5

.

18-2-6.
Applicability to deceased and continuing trustees.

The provisions of §§

18-2-1

—

18-2-8

, as far as they relate to a trustee who is dead, shall include the case of a person nominated trustee in a will but dying before the testator; and these provisions, as far as they relate to a continuing trustee, shall include a refusing or retiring trustee, if willing to act in the execution of the provisions of §§

18-2-1

—

18-2-8

.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 208, § 6; G.L. 1909, ch. 259, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 303, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 486, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

18-2-6

.

18-2-7.
Provisions of instrument controlling.

Sections

18-2-1

—

18-2-6

apply only if, and as far as, a contrary intention is not expressed in the instrument, if any, creating the trust, and shall have effect subject to the terms of that instrument, and to any provisions contained in the instrument.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 208, § 7; G.L. 1909, ch. 259, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 303, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 486, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

18-2-7

.

18-2-8.
Applicability to prior trusts — Powers additional.

Sections

18-2-1

—

18-2-6

apply to trusts previously or subsequently created, and shall be considered in addition to the ordinary equity powers of any court.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 208, § 8; G.L. 1909, ch. 259, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 303, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 486, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

18-2-8

; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 78.

18-2-9.
Recording of decree of appointment.

In case real estate constitutes any portion of the trust property, a certified copy of the order or decree of the court appointing the trustees, under the seal of the court making the order or decree, shall be recorded in the records of land evidence in the town or city where the real estate lies; and in case personal estate constitutes the trust property or any portion of it, a copy of the order or decree of the court, similarly certified, shall be recorded in the records of land evidence in the town or city in which the trustee or trustees, or any of them, may reside.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 208, § 10; G.L. 1909, ch. 259, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 303, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 486, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

18-2-9

.